California, session 20252026, SB964.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1367.225 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1367.225. (a) An enrollee’s treating provider may request, and shall be granted, the authority to adjust the dose or frequency of a drug to meet the specific medical needs of the enrollee without prior authorization or subsequent utilization management if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The drug previously had been approved for coverage by the plan for an enrollee’s chronic medical condition or cancer treatment and the enrollee’s treating provider continues to prescribe the drug for the enrollee’s chronic medical condition or cancer treatment.(2) The drug is not an opioid or a scheduled controlled substance.(3) The dose has not been adjusted more than two times without prior authorization.(4) If the adjusted dose or frequency is for an off-label use, two articles from major peer-reviewed medical journals have presented data supporting the proposed off-label use as generally safe and effective as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1367.21.(b) This section does not apply to a Medi-Cal managed care plan contracting with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.SEC. 2. Section 10123.1934 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10123.1934. An insured’s treating provider may request, and shall be granted, the authority to adjust the dose or frequency of a drug to meet the specific medical needs of the insured without prior authorization or subsequent utilization management if all of the following conditions are met:(a) The drug previously had been approved for coverage by the insurer for an insured’s chronic medical condition or cancer treatment and the insured’s treating provider continues to prescribe the drug for the insured’s chronic medical condition or cancer treatment.(b) The drug is not an opioid or a scheduled controlled substance.(c) The dose has not been adjusted more than two times without prior authorization.(d) If the adjusted dose or frequency is for an off-label use, two articles from major peer-reviewed medical journals have presented data supporting the proposed off-label use as generally safe and effective as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10123.195.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.